Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
ARTICLE 13
DISPOSITION OF PERSONAL PROPERTY

Section

42-13-101. Scope and effect of article - exception to provisions.

This article shall apply to all personal property acquired or held by a law enforcement agency in the course of motor vehicle law enforcement or related highway duties and under circumstances supporting a reasonable belief that such property was abandoned, lost, stolen, or otherwise illegally possessed, including property left in abandoned vehicles or at vehicle accident locations, unclaimed property obtained by a search and seizure, and unclaimed property used as evidence in any criminal trial, except for such other personal property as shall be disposed of in a different manner in accordance with other Colorado statutes.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2513, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-16-101 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-101 was relocated to § 42-11-101.

42-13-102. Return of property.

Any personal property of the type described in section 42-13-101 and believed to be abandoned, lost, stolen, or otherwise illegally possessed shall be retained in custody by the sheriff, chief of police, or chief of the Colorado state patrol or by a designated representative within the law enforcement agency, who shall make reasonable inquiry and effort to identify and notify the owner or person entitled to possession thereof and shall return the property after such owner or person provides reasonable and satisfactory proof of ownership or right to possession and reimburses the law enforcement agency for all reasonable expenses of such custody and handling.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2513, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-16-102 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-102 was relocated to § 42-11-102.

42-13-103. Sale of unclaimed property.

If the identity or location of the owner or person entitled to possession of the property has not been ascertained within six months after the law enforcement agency obtains possession of the property described in section 42-13-101, the sheriff, chief of police, or chief of the Colorado state patrol or a designated representative within the law enforcement agency shall effectuate the sale of such property for cash to the highest bidder at a public auction, notice of which, including time, place, and a brief description of such property, shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county wherein such official has authority or jurisdiction or, in the case of the Colorado state patrol, in the county wherein said public auction is to be held at least ten days prior to such auction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2514, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-16-103 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-103 was relocated to § 42-11-103.

42-13-104. Deposit of proceeds.

Proceeds from the sale of property at public auction, less reimbursement of the law enforcement agency for the reasonable expenses of custody and handling thereof, shall be deposited in the treasury of the county, city and county, city, town, or state of which government the law enforcement agency is a branch.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2514, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-16-104 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-104 was relocated to § 42-11-104.

42-13-105. Release of impounded vehicles - penalty.

Any owner, operator, or employee of any garage or service station or any appointed custodian who releases any vehicle impounded or ordered held by an officer of the Colorado state patrol without a release from an officer of the Colorado state patrol or a bona fide court order commits a class 3 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2514, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1564, § 380, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-33.5-213 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-105 was relocated to § 42-11-105.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-13-106. Impounded vehicles - notice - hearing.

Whenever a motor vehicle is impounded and ordered held by the Colorado state patrol for a violation of motor vehicle registration or inspection laws, said patrol shall notify the registered owner of record of the impoundment of such vehicle and of the owner's opportunity to request a hearing to determine the validity of the impoundment.

Such notice shall be sent by certified mail to the owner of the motor vehicle within forty-eight hours of impoundment, excluding weekends and holidays, and shall include the following information:

The address and telephone number of the Colorado state patrol;

The location of storage of the motor vehicle;

A description of the motor vehicle, which shall include, if available, the make, model, license plate number, mileage, and vehicle identification number;

The reason for which the motor vehicle was ordered held;

A citation to this section as the basis for the hearing provided for in subsection (1) of this section;

That, if the owner fails to request a hearing or if the impoundment is determined to be valid and the owner does not comply with the appropriate statute within thirty days, the motor vehicle may be subject to sale; and

That, in order to obtain a hearing concerning the validity of the impoundment, the owner must request such hearing in writing in the county court of the county in which the motor vehicle was impounded within ten days after the date appearing on the notice.

Any notice sent to the owner of a motor vehicle pursuant to this section shall also include a form that the owner shall use when requesting a hearing in the county court of the county in which the motor vehicle is impounded. Such form shall include at least the following:

The name and address of the owner of the impounded motor vehicle;

A description of the motor vehicle as specified in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section;

The reason for which the motor vehicle was ordered held;

A printed citation to this section as the basis for the requested hearing;

A printed statement naming the Colorado state patrol as a party to the action;

A printed statement that the hearing is requested to contest the legality of the impoundment; and

A statement to the owner of the motor vehicle that a copy of the citation on which the impoundment was based and a copy of the notice served on the owner by the Colorado state patrol must be attached to the form to complete the owner's request for a hearing.

Any such hearing shall be conducted within five days after the court's receipt of the owner's request for a hearing, excluding weekends and holidays. The clerk of the county court to which the request for hearing was made shall provide written notice of the scheduled date, time, and location of said hearing to both the requesting party and the Colorado state patrol, which notice shall be delivered at least two days prior to the hearing date. The failure of the owner to request or to attend a scheduled hearing shall satisfy the hearing requirement of this section.

The sole issue of the hearing shall be the legality of the impoundment of the motor vehicle. The burden of proof shall be on the Colorado state patrol to establish probable cause for the impoundment.

If the court determines that the impoundment was invalid, the Colorado state patrol shall be responsible only for the costs incurred in the towing and storage of the motor vehicle. If the court determines that the impoundment was valid and if the owner does not comply with the appropriate statute within ten days after the court's decision and refuses to remove the motor vehicle by means other than under its own power on a public highway, the Colorado state patrol shall have reasonable grounds to believe that the motor vehicle has been abandoned, and the provisions of part 18 or 21 of article 4 of this title shall apply; except that any notice or hearing requirements of said part 18 or 21 of article 4 of this title as to owners of motor vehicles shall be deemed to have been met by the notice and hearing provisions of this section. Nevertheless, the notice and hearing requirements of said part 18 or 21 of article 4 of this title as to lienholders, other than section 42-4-1814, shall not be deemed to have been met by the notice and hearing provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to removal of motor vehicles for any purpose other than those specified in this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2514, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(6) amended, p. 485, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-33.5-213.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-106 was relocated to § 42-11-106.

42-13-107. Recovery of property - limitation.

The owner or person entitled to possession of the property described in section 42-13-101 may claim and recover possession of the property at any time before its sale at public auction upon providing reasonable and satisfactory proof of ownership or right to possession and after reimbursing the law enforcement agency for all reasonable expenses of custody and handling thereof.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2516, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-16-105 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-107 was relocated to § 42-11-107.

42-13-108. Damages.

No person or agency shall be responsible for consequent damages to another occasioned by an act or omission in compliance with this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2516, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-16-106 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-13-108 was relocated to § 42-4-903.

42-13-109. Local regulations.

The provisions of this article may be superseded by ordinance or resolution of a municipality or county which sets forth procedures for disposition of personal property.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2516, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-16-107 as it existed prior to 1994.